Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 30

Viticulture [Repealed]

43-30-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 387, § 1; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 444, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 43, Chapter 30, §§ 43-30-101–43-30-104 concerned viticulture.

43-30-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 387, § 2; 1991, ch. 104, §§ 3-6; 2016, ch. 1042, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 43, Chapter 30, §§ 43-30-101–43-30-104 concerned viticulture.

43-30-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 387, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 43, Chapter 30, §§ 43-30-101–43-30-104 concerned viticulture.

43-30-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 387, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 43, Chapter 30, §§ 43-30-101–43-30-104 concerned viticulture.